District of Columbia statutes.
37-205.02

Markets; disposition of receipts; charges.

On and after July 1, 1906, all receipts of the Wholesale Producers’ Market, including the receipts for the occupation of the south side of B Street northwest, and the Farmers’ Street Markets adjacent to the Western and Georgetown Markets, respectively, shall be paid to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue, to the credit of the revenues of the District, weekly. There is hereby authorized for the use of space at the above-mentioned street markets a space charge of $1 per day for each space occupied for rent. The market masters of the several markets herein mentioned shall make collections daily and make a return thereof, with a sworn statement, weekly to the sealer of weights and measures, who shall deposit the same with the Mayor to the credit of the revenues of the District of Columbia.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall amend by rule from time to time the charge imposed for the use of space at the street markets mentioned in this section.

June 27, 1906, 34 Stat. 485, ch. 3553
Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 940, ch. 150
Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1225, ch. 118, § 33
Nov. 15, 1983, D.C. Law 5-39,§ 2, 30 DCR 4991
Apr. 16, 1999, D.C. Law 12-228, § 15, 46 DCR 1066

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: The Office of the Collector of Taxes was abolished and the functions thereof transferred to the Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia by Reorganization Plan No. 5 of 1952. All functions of the Office of the Collector of Taxes including the functions of all officers, employees and subordinate agencies were transferred to the Director, Department of General Administration by Reorganization Order No. 3, dated August 28, 1952. Reorganization Order No. 20, dated November 10, 1952, transferred the functions of the Collector of Taxes to the Finance Office. The same Order provided for the Office of the Collector of Taxes headed by a Collector in the Finance Office, and abolished the previously existing Office of the Collector of Taxes. Reorganization Order No. 20 was superseded and replaced by Organization Order No. 121, dated December 12, 1957, which provided that the Finance Office (consisting of the Office of the Finance Officer, Property Tax Division, Revenue Division, Treasury Division, Accounting Division, and Data Processing Division) would continue under the direction and control of the Director of General Administration, and that the Treasury Division would perform the function of collecting revenues of the District of Columbia and depositing the same with the Treasurer of the United States. Organization Order No. 121 was revoked by Organization Order No. 3, dated December 13, 1967, Part IVC of which prescribed the functions of the Finance Office within a newly established Department of General Administration. The executive functions of the Board of Commissioners were transferred to the Commissioner of the District of Columbia by § 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967. Functions of the Finance Office as stated in Part IVC of Organization Order No. 3 were transferred to the Director of the Department of Finance and Revenue by Commissioner’s Order No. 69-96, dated March 7, 1969.

Temporary continuation of non-food open air retailing at Eastern Market: Sections 2 and 3 of D.C. Law 12-133, the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Temporary Act of 1998, provide, on a temporary basis, for the interim continuation of non-food open air retailing in the exterior space at Eastern Market that is not otherwise leased.

Section 5(b) of D.C. Law 12-133 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Temporary continuation of non-food open air retailing at Eastern Market: Sections 2 and 3 of D.C. Law 12-150, the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Temporary Act of 1998, provide, on a temporary basis, for the interim continuation of non-food open air retailing in the exterior space at Eastern Market and to clarify the extent to which exterior space is otherwise leased.

Section 4 of D.C. Law 12-150 provided for the repeal of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Temporary Act of 1998.

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 12-150 provided that the act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.

Pursuant to the Office of the Chief Financial Officer’s “Notice of Public Interest” published in the April 18, 1997, issue of the District of Columbia Register ( 44 DCR 2345) the Office of Tax and Revenue assumed all of the duties and functions previously performed by the Department of Finance and Revenue, as set forth in Commissioner’s Order 69-96, dated March 7, 1969. This action was made effective January 22, 1997, nunc pro tunc.
Section 3 of D.C. Law 5-39 provided that § 2 of the act shall take effect 30 days following November 15, 1983.
For temporary (90-day) continuation and clarification provisions relative to the Eastern Market, see § 2 of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Emergency Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-54, April 6, 1999, 46 DCR 3648).
For temporary provision to permit, on an emergency basis, the interim continuation of non-food open air retailing in the exterior space at Eastern Market and to clarify the extent to which exterior space is otherwise leased, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Second Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-352, May 12, 1998, 45 DCR 3104), and §§ 2 and 3 of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-435, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 5951).
For temporary provision to permit, on an emergency basis, the interim continuation of non-food open air retailing in the exterior space at Eastern Market that is not otherwise leased, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-320, April 6, 1998, 45 DCR 2296). D.C. Act 12-320 was subsequently repealed by § 4(a) of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Second Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-352, May 12, 1998, 45 DCR 3104), and § 4(a) of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-435, August 12, 1998, 45 DCR 5951).
For temporary repeal of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Temporary Act of 1998 (Bill 12-513), see § 4(b) of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Second Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-352, May 12, 1998, 45 DCR 3104).
For temporary repeal of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-320), see § 4(a) of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Second Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-352, May 12, 1998, 45 DCR 3104).
For temporary permission, on an emergency basis, for the interim continuation of non-food open air retailing, see §§ 2 and 3 of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act. 12-320, April 6, 1998, 45 DCR 2296), and see §§ 2 and 3 of the Eastern Market Open Air Retailing Second Emergency Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-352, May 12, 1998, 45 DCR 3104).
1973 Ed., § 10-136.
1981 Ed., § 10-138.
Eastern Market real property asset management and outdoor vending, see § 37-301 et seq.
Disposition of fees, see § 47-127.